work/esperanto.aff
flag *X:
    A	     >	-A,-
    E	     >	-E,-
    J	     >	-J,-
    N	     >	-N,-
    O	     >	-O,-
    O N	     >	-ON,^'           # Konstantinolon/X, sed NE nuda Konstantinopol
    [^G] I   >	-I,-

    ^'	     >	-^',-		# Kapernaum^'/X, eventuale la nuda Kapernaum
    ^'	     >	-^',O
    ^'	     >	-^',ON

    I G I >	-GI,^GI
    I G I >	-GI,^GAS
    I G I >	-GI,^GIS
    I G I >	-GI,^GOS
    I G I >	-GI,^GUS
    I G I >	-GI,^GU
    I G I >	-GI,^GADI
    I G I >	-GI,^GADAS
    I G I >	-GI,^GADIS
    I G I >	-GI,^GADOS
    I G I >	-GI,^GADUS
    I G I >	-GI,^GADU
    I G I	>	-GI,^GAD^'
    I G I	>	-GI,^GADO
    I G I	>	-GI,^GADOJ
    I G I	>	-GI,^GADOJN
    I G I	>	-GI,^GADON
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GINTA
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GINTAJ
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GINTAJN
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GINTAN
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GINTE
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GINT^'
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GINTO
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GINTOJ
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GINTOJN
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GINTON
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GANTA
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GANTAJ
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GANTAJN
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GANTAN
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GANTE
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GANT^'
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GANTO
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GANTOJ
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GANTOJN
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GANTON
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GONTA
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GONTAJ
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GONTAJN
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GONTAN
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GONTE
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GONT^'
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GONTO
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GONTOJ
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GONTOJN
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GONTON
   I G I	>	-IGI,I^GINTINA
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GINTINAJ
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GINTINAJN
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GINTINAN
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GINTIN^'
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GINTINO
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GINTINOJ
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GINTINOJN
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GINTINON
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GANTINA
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GANTINAJ
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GANTINAJN
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GANTINAN
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GANTIN^'
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GANTINO
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GANTINOJ
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GANTINOJN
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GANTINON
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GONTINA
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GONTINAJ
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GONTINAJN
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GONTINAN
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GONTIN^'
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GONTINO
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GONTINOJ
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GONTINOJN
    I G I	>	-IGI,I^GONTINON
    I G I	>	-GI,^GA
    I G I	>	-GI,^GAJ
    I G I	>	-GI,^GAJN
    I G I	>	-GI,^GAN
    I G I	>	-GI,^GE
    I G I	>	-GI,^G^'
    I G I	>	-GI,^GO
    I G I	>	-GI,^GOJ
    I G I	>	-GI,^GOJN
    I G I	>	-GI,^GON
    I G I	>	-GI,^GEMA
    I G I	>	-GI,^GEMAJ
    I G I	>	-GI,^GEMAJN
    I G I	>	-GI,^GEMAN
    I G I	>	-GI,^GEME
    I G I	>	-GI,^GEM^'
    I G I	>	-GI,^GEMO
    I G I	>	-GI,^GEMOJ
    I G I	>	-GI,^GEMOJN
    I G I	>	-GI,^GEMON

    I G I	>	-GI,^GEMEC^'
    I G I	>	-GI,^GEMECO
    I G I	>	-GI,^GEMECOJ
    I G I	>	-GI,^GEMECOJN
    I G I	>	-GI,^GEMECON

flag *Y:
    A	>	^JA
    A	>	^JAJ
    A	>	^JAJN
    A	>	^JAN
    A	>	^JE
    A	>	^J^'
    A	>	^JO
    A	>	^JOJ
    A	>	^JOJN
    A	>	^JON
    E	>	-E,A^JA
    E	>	-E,A^JAJ
    E	>	-E,A^JAJN
    E	>	-E,A^JAN
    E	>	-E,A^JE
    E	>	-E,A^J^'
    E	>	-E,A^JO
    E	>	-E,A^JOJ
    E	>	-E,A^JOJN
    E	>	-E,A^JON
    I	>	-I,A^JA
    I	>	-I,A^JAJ
    I	>	-I,A^JAJN
    I	>	-I,A^JAN
    I	>	-I,A^JE
    I	>	-I,A^J^'
    I	>	-I,A^JO
    I	>	-I,A^JOJ
    I	>	-I,A^JOJN
    I	>	-I,A^JON
    O	>	-O,A^JA
    O	>	-O,A^JAJ
    O	>	-O,A^JAJN
    O	>	-O,A^JAN
    O	>	-O,A^JE
    O	>	-O,A^J^'
    O	>	-O,A^JO
    O	>	-O,A^JOJ
    O	>	-O,A^JOJN
    O	>	-O,A^JON
    U	>	-U,A^JA
    U	>	-U,A^JAJ
    U	>	-U,A^JAJN
    U	>	-U,A^JAN
    U	>	-U,A^JE
    U	>	-U,A^J^'
    U	>	-U,A^JO
    U	>	-U,A^JOJ
    U	>	-U,A^JOJN
    U	>	-U,A^JON

flag Z:
    A	>	-A,ISMA
    A	>	-A,ISMAJ
    A	>	-A,ISMAJN
    A	>	-A,ISMAN
    A	>	-A,ISME
    A	>	-A,ISM^'
    A	>	-A,ISMO
    A	>	-A,ISMOJ
    A	>	-A,ISMOJN
    A	>	-A,ISMON
    I	>	SMA
    I	>	SMAJ
    I	>	SMAJN
    I	>	SMAN
    I	>	SME
    I	>	SM^'
    I	>	SMO
    I	>	SMOJ
    I	>	SMOJN
    I	>	SMON
    O	>	-O,ISMA
    O	>	-O,ISMAJ
    O	>	-O,ISMAJN
    O	>	-O,ISMAN
    O	>	-O,ISME
    O	>	-O,ISM^'
    O	>	-O,ISMO
    O	>	-O,ISMOJ
    O	>	-O,ISMOJN
    O	>	-O,ISMON

# esperanto.aff finigxas cxi tie.
